Louisiana, session 2026, SB209.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 45:844.42(7), 844.45(B), 844.47, 844.52(C), and 844.53(2) through
(4) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 45:844.42(8) through (18) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§844.42. Legislative findings and declarations of intent
The legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of this state:
* * *
(7) To ensure that when a local government provides to its inhabitants cable
television services, telecommunications services or advanced services, or any
Page 1 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-366 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 209
combination thereof, it will not be precluded from engaging in "bundling" those
services or engaging in any other lawful business practice that its private-sector
competitors are legally permitted to engage in.
(8) To ensure that when a local government provides to its inhabitants
cable television services, telecommunications services, or advanced services, or
any combination thereof, it shall not be precluded from engaging in any other
lawful business practice that its private sector competitors are legally permitted
to engage in.
(9) To promote reliable and effective interoperability between local
public safety and national communications networks.
(10) To ensure that local governments establish basic and reliable
communications among state and local law enforcement and emergency
agencies.
(11) To ensure that local governments provide effective access to
important safety and other information during times of emergency.
(12) To ensure that individuals are able to access necessary information
as easily as possible so they can make appropriate, important, or necessary
personal and business decisions.
(13) To foster commerce, education, public safety, and economic
development through the development and expansion of broadband services.
(14) To foster development and expansion of broadband services to
unserved and underserved communities in the state.
(15) To foster opportunities for local governments to receive or
participate in grant programs for the purpose of broadband development and
expansion.
(16) To enable governmental entities to freely develop and implement
broadband projects with each other.
(17) To enable governmental entities to freely develop and implement
broadband projects for any purpose consistent with an authorized function of
Page 2 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-366 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 209
the local government.
(18) To enable local governments in the state to be more competitive with
local governments in other states in the areas of education and economic
development.
* * *
§844.45. Scope of Chapter
* * *
B. Nothing in this Chapter shall apply to a local government purchasing,
leasing, constructing, operating, or equipping facilities:
(1) That are designed to provide services within the city or parish or both.
(2) That the local government government uses for internal local
government purposes. For the purposes of this Paragraph, "internal local
government purposes" shall mean any of the following:
(a) Uses for internal local governmental purposes Any purpose consistent
with an authorized function of the local government.
(b) By written contract, leases, sells capacity in, or grants other similar rights
to a private provider to use the facilities in connection with a private provider
offering a covered service Any use of the facilities by a department, division,
agency, or other operational unit of the local government.
(c) Any use of the facilities by another local government or by the state
or federal government.
(2) To provide covered services to unserved or underserved areas as
defined by 47 U.S.C. §1702, as amended and as amended hereafter.
(3) Through a partnership, joint venture, or cooperative endeavor
agreement with a public or private entity for the purchasing, leasing,
constructing, operating, or equipping of broadband facilities or services.
(4) Funded in whole or in part by any grant program of the state or
federal government, established for the development or expansion of broadband
service, including but not limited to GUMBO 1.0, GUMBO 2.0, GUMBO 3.0,
Page 3 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-366 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 209
GUMBO 4.0; the Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment (BEAD)
Program, the Rural eConnectivity (ReConnect) Program, the Broadband
Infrastructure Program, the Enabling Middle Mile Broadband Infrastructure
Program, the Digital Equity Competitive Grant Program, the Connecting
Minority Communities Pilot Program, the Community Connect Grant
Program, and the Distance Learning and Telemedicine Grant Program.
(5) For the purposes of fostering commerce, education, public safety, or
economic development, in whole or part.
(6) That the local government, by written contract, leases, sells capacity
in, or grants other similar rights to a private provider to use the facilities in
connection with a private provider offering a covered service.
* * *
§844.47. Limitations on providing cable television and telecommunications and
advanced services
A. Except as provided in this Chapter, a local government may not:
(1) Provide to one or more subscribers a covered service.
(2) For the purpose of providing a covered service to one or more subscribers,
purchase, lease, construct, maintain, or operate any facility.
B. For purposes of this Chapter, a local government provides a covered
service if the local government provides the service:
(1) Directly or indirectly, including through an authority or instrumentality
acting on behalf of the local government or for the benefit of the local government.
(2) By itself.
(3) Through a partnership or joint venture.
(4) By contract, resale, or otherwise.
* * *
§844.52. Bonding authority
* * *
C.(1) A bond issued under this Section shall be secured and paid for solely
Page 4 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-366 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 209
from the revenues generated by the local government from providing the covered
services.
(2) A local government may not pay the origination, financing, or other
carrying costs associated with the one or more bonds issued under this Section from
the general funds or other enterprise funds of the local government. Nothing in this
Section shall preclude a local government from using the general funds or other
enterprise funds to advance funds for the feasibility study prescribed under R.S.
45:844.49 or for start-up costs for the proposed venture, provided that any such funds
advanced are repaid by the enterprise fund established under R.S. 45:844.51 at
interest rates and on terms and conditions available to private enterprises in the open
market.
(3) Nothing in this Chapter shall preclude a local government that owns and
operates electric, water, gas, sewer and other utilities from pledging the resources of
such utilities to obtain the best available interest rates, terms and conditions for the
bonds necessary to finance the facilities used to provide the proposed covered
services.
(4)(2) Nothing under this Section provides a local governing authority
bonding authority in addition to that provided under existing state law.
§844.53. General operating limitations
* * *
(2)(a) A local government may not cross-subsidize its covered services with
tax dollars, income from other local government or utility services, below-market
rate loans from the local government or any other means.
(3)(a) A local government may not make or grant any undue or unreasonable
preference or advantage to itself or to any private provider of covered services.
(b) A local government shall apply without discrimination as to itself and to
any private provider the local government's ordinances, rules, and policies, including
those relating to obligation to serve, access to public rights of way, permitting,
performance bonding, reporting, and quality of service.
Page 5 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-366 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 209
(4)(3) In calculating the rates charged by a local government for a covered
service, the local government:
(a) Shall include within its rates an amount equal to all taxes, fees, and other
assessments that would be applicable to a similarly situated private provider of the
same services, including:
(i) Federal, state, and local taxes; provided that, for income taxes, the imputed
rate shall be the lowest rate that any private provider of covered service actually pays
for the year prior to the year at issue, as the Louisiana Public Service Commission
determines from data available to it, or zero percent, whichever is higher.
(ii) Franchise fees.
(iii) Permit fees.
(iv) Pole attachment fees.
(v) Fees similar to those described in this Subparagraph.
(b) Shall receive a credit for all payments in lieu of taxes that it pays to the
local government on revenues from the provision of the covered services.
(c) May may bundle one or more covered services and offer promotional
discounts or engage in other business practices on the same terms and conditions as
federal and state law, including applicable rules of the Louisiana Public Service
Commission, permit similarly situated private providers to bundle covered services.;
provided, however, that the local government shall establish its prices for covered
services at levels that will, in the aggregate, over the useful life of the facilities used
to provide such services, recover the sum of:
(i) The actual direct costs of providing the service.
(ii) The actual indirect costs of providing the service.
(iii) The amount determined under Subparagraph (4)(a); provided further that
the local government's useful life of the facilities shall be substantially similar to the
average life of the facilities used by private providers to provide covered services.
Nothing in this Subparagraph shall authorize local governments to engage in cross-
subsidizations prohibited by this Chapter or other pricing in violation of federal or
Page 6 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-366 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 209
state law, including rules of the Louisiana Public Service Commission.
(5)(4) A local government that provides covered services shall keep separate
and accurate books and records of the local government's covered services, and they
shall be made available for audits of such books and records as set forth in R.S.
45:844.55(D).
Section 2. R.S. 45:844.53(5) and 844.55(D) are hereby repealed.